Washington statutes.
RCW 35.18.170

Council meetings.

The council shall meet at the times and places fixed by ordinance but must hold at least one regular meeting each month. The clerk shall call special meetings of the council upon request of the mayor or any two members. At all meetings of the city council, a majority of the councilmembers shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, but a less number may adjourn from time to time and may compel the attendance of absent members in such manner and under such penalties as may be prescribed by ordinance. Requests for special meetings shall state the subject to be considered and no other subject shall be considered at a special meeting.

All meetings of the council and of committees thereof shall be open to the public and the rules of the council shall provide that citizens of the city or town shall have a reasonable opportunity to be heard at any meetings in regard to any matter being considered thereat.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2029; 1965 c 7 s 35.18.170. Prior: 1955 c 337 s 20; prior: 1943 c 271 s 7; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9198-16.]